Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.486

District policy on the use of isolation and restraint—Notice to parents and guardians of children who have individualized education programs or plans developed under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973.

Parents and guardians of children who have individualized education programs or plans developed under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973 must be provided a copy of the district policy on the use of isolation and restraint at the time that the program or plan is created.

[ 2013 c 202 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2013 c 202: See note following RCW 28A.600.485.